Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-845
Limited common elements; allocation; how made.

(a) Except for the limited common elements described in subdivisions (2) and (4) of section 76-839, the declaration shall specify to which unit or units each limited common element is allocated. That allocation may not be altered without the consent of the unit owners whose units are affected.

(b) Except as the declaration otherwise provided, a limited common element may be reallocated by an amendment to the declaration executed by the unit owners between or among whose units the reallocation is made. The persons executing the amendment shall provide a copy thereof to the association, which shall record it.

(c) A common element not previously allocated as a limited common element may not be so allocated except pursuant to provisions in the declaration. The allocations shall be made by amendments to the declaration.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 21.